Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.120

Money, property, income held in trust.

All moneys in members' accounts, all property and rights purchased therewith, and all income attributable thereto, shall be held in trust by the state investment board, as set forth under RCW 43.33A.030, for the exclusive benefit of the members and their beneficiaries.

[ 1998 c 341 s 306.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 341: See note following RCW 41.34.060.